Nebraska, session 109, LB24.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB24 LB24
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-2262.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2262.06 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
whenever a district court or county court sentences an adult offender to
probation, the court shall require the probationer to pay a one-time
administrative enrollment fee and thereafter a monthly probation
programming fee.
(2) Participants in non-probation-based programs or services in
which probation personnel or probation resources are utilized pursuant to
an interlocal agreement authorized by subdivision (16) of section 29-2252
and in which all or a portion of the costs of such probation personnel or
such probation resources are covered by funds provided pursuant to
section 29-2262.07 shall pay the one-time administrative enrollment fee
described in subdivision (3)(a) of this section and the monthly probation
programming fee described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section. In
addition, the provisions of subsections (4), (7), and (10) of this
section applicable to probationers apply to participants in non-
probation-based programs or services. Any participant in a non-probation-
based program or service who defaults on the payment of any such fees
may, at the discretion of the court, be subject to removal from such non-
probation-based program or service. This subdivision does not preclude a
court or other governmental entity from charging additional local fees
for participation in such non-probation-based programs and services or
other similar non-probation-based programs and services.
(3) The court shall establish the administrative enrollment fee and
monthly probation programming fees as follows:
(a) Adult probationers placed on either probation or intensive
supervision probation and participants in non-probation-based programs or
services shall pay a one-time administrative enrollment fee of thirty
dollars. The fee shall be paid in a lump sum upon the beginning of
probation supervision or participation in a non-probation-based program
-2-

LB24 LB24
2025 2025
or service;
(b) Adult probationers placed on probation shall pay a monthly
probation programming fee of twenty-five dollars, not later than the
tenth day of each month, for the duration of probation; and
(c) Adult probationers placed on intensive supervision probation and
participants in non-probation-based programs or services shall pay a
monthly probation programming fee of thirty-five dollars, not later than
the tenth day of each month, for the duration of probation or
participation in a non-probation-based program or service.
(4) The court shall waive payment of the monthly probation
programming fees in whole or in part if the offender has been previously
found to be indigent in the case for which he or she is placed on
probation or if after a hearing a determination is made that such payment
would constitute an undue hardship on the offender due to limited income,
employment or school status, or physical or mental handicap. Such waiver
shall be in effect only during the period of time that the probationer or
participant in a non-probation-based program or service is unable to pay
his or her monthly probation programming fee.
(5) If a probationer defaults in the payment of monthly probation
programming fees or any installment thereof, the court may revoke his or
her probation for nonpayment, except that probation shall not be revoked
nor shall the offender be imprisoned for such nonpayment if the
probationer is financially unable to make the payment, if he or she so
states to the court in writing under oath, and if the court so finds
after a hearing.
(6) If the court determines that the default in payment described in
subsection (5) of this section was not attributable to a deliberate
refusal to obey the order of the court or to failure on the probationer's
part to make a good faith effort to obtain the funds required for
payment, the court may enter an order allowing the probationer additional
time for payment, reducing the amount of each installment, or revoking
-3-

LB24 LB24
2025 2025
the fees or the unpaid portion in whole or in part.
(7) No probationer or participant in a non-probation-based program
or service shall be required to pay more than one monthly probation
programming fee per month. This subsection does not preclude local fees
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(8) The imposition of monthly probation programming fees in this
section shall be considered separate and apart from the fees described in
subdivisions (2)(m) and (o) of section 29-2262.
(9) The court shall waive payment of the fees described in
subdivisions (2)(m) and (o) of section 29-2262 in whole or in part if the
offender has been previously found to be indigent in the case for which
he or she is placed on probation or if after a hearing a determination is
made that such payment would constitute an undue hardship on the offender
due to limited income, employment or school status, or physical or mental
handicap. Such waiver shall be in effect only during the period of time
that the probationer or participant in a non-probation-based program or
service is unable to pay his or her monthly probation programming fee.
(10) (9) Any adult probationer received for supervision pursuant to
section 29-2637 or the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision
shall be assessed both a one-time administrative enrollment fee and
monthly probation programming fees during the period of time the
probationer is actively supervised by Nebraska probation authorities.
(11) (10) The probationer or participant in a non-probation-based
program or service shall pay the fees described in this section to the
clerk of the court. The clerk of the court shall remit all fees so
collected to the State Treasurer for credit to the Probation Program Cash
Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 29-2267, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2267 (1) Whenever a motion or information to revoke probation is
filed, the probationer shall be entitled to a prompt consideration of
-4-

LB24 LB24
2025 2025
such charge by the sentencing court. The court shall not revoke probation
or increase the probation requirements imposed on the probationer, except
after a hearing upon proper notice where the violation of probation is
established by clear and convincing evidence.
(2) The probationer shall have the right to receive, prior to the
hearing, a copy of the information or written notice of the grounds on
which the information is based. The probationer shall have the right to
hear and controvert the evidence against him or her, to offer evidence in
his or her defense, and to be represented by counsel.
(3) For a probationer convicted of a felony, revocation proceedings
may only be instituted in response to a substance abuse or noncriminal
violation if the probationer has served ninety days of cumulative
custodial sanctions during the current probation term.
(4) When a motion or information to revoke probation is filed, the
probation term may be extended at the joint request of the probationer
and prosecutor until final resolution of the motion or information to
revoke probation or until the expiration of the statutorily defined
maximum period of probation for the offense for which the probationer has
been placed on probation. A court shall accept such request to extend a
term of probation so long as the probationer is represented by counsel or
the court finds, in open court, that the probationer makes the request
freely, voluntarily, knowingly, and intelligently.
Sec. 3. Original sections 29-2262.06 and 29-2267, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-